District of Columbia statutes.
7-1106

Distribution of copies of chapter.

Duly authorized copies of this chapter shall, upon its approval, be transmitted by the Mayor or his designated agent to the Governor of each state, the Attorney General and the Administrator of General Services of the United States, and the Council of State Governments.

History

Apr. 26, 1972, 86 Stat. 131, Pub. L. 92-280, § 7

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-1806.
1973 Ed., § 6-1606.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to the District of Columbia Council and to a Commissioner of the District of Columbia. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia, and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.